Illinois, session 104th, HB3207.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 5Sections 9-8 and 25-1 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 5/9-8)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 9-8)7    Sec. 9-8. Distribution on summary administration. Upon the 8filing of a petition therefor in the court of the proper county 9by any interested person and after ascertainment of heirship 10of the decedent and admission of the will, if any, to probate, 11if it appears to the court that: 12        (a) the gross value of the decedent's real and 13    personal estate subject to administration in this State as 14    itemized in the petition does not exceed $500,000 15    $100,000; 16        (b) there is no unpaid claim against the estate, or 17    all claimants known to the petitioner, with the amount 18    known by him to be due to each of them, are listed in the 19    petition; 20        (c) no tax will be due to the United States or to this 21    State by reason of the death of the decedent or all such 22    taxes have been paid or provided for or are the obligation 23    of another fiduciary;   HB3207- 2 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1        (d) no person is entitled to a surviving spouse's or 2    child's award under this Act, or a surviving spouse's or 3    child's award is allowable under this Act, and the name 4    and age of each person entitled to an award, with the 5    minimum award allowable under this Act to the surviving 6    spouse or child, or each of them, and the amount, if any, 7    theretofore paid to the spouse or child on such award, are 8    listed in the petition; 9        (e) all heirs and legatees of the decedent have 10    consented in writing to distribution of the estate on 11    summary administration (and if an heir or legatee is a 12    minor or person with a disability, the consent may be 13    given on his behalf by his parent, spouse, adult child, 14    person in loco parentis, guardian or guardian ad litem); 15        (f) each distributee gives bond in the value of his 16    distributive share, conditioned to refund the due 17    proportion of any claim entitled to be paid from the 18    estate distributed, including the claim of any person 19    having a prior right to such distribution, together with 20    expenses of recovery, including reasonable attorneys' 21    fees, with surety to be approved by the court. If at any 22    time after payment of a distributive share it becomes 23    necessary for all or any part of the distributive share to 24    be refunded for the payment of any claim entitled to be 25    paid from the estate distributed or to provide for a 26    distribution to any person having a prior right thereto,   HB3207- 3 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1    upon petition of any interested person the court shall 2    order the distributee to refund that portion of his 3    distributive share which is necessary for such purposes. 4    If there is more than one distributee, the court shall 5    apportion among the distributees the amount to be refunded 6    according to the amount received by each of them, but 7    specific and general legacies need not be refunded unless 8    the residue is insufficient to satisfy the claims entitled 9    to be paid from the estate distributed. If a distributee 10    refuses to refund within 60 days after being ordered by 11    the court to do so and upon demand, the refusal is deemed a 12    breach of the bond and a civil action may be maintained by 13    the claimant or person having a prior right to a 14    distribution against the distributee and the surety or 15    either of them for the amount due together with the 16    expenses of recovery, including reasonable attorneys' 17    fees. The order of the court is evidence of the amount due; 18        (g) the petitioner has published a notice informing 19    all persons of the death of the decedent, of the filing of 20    the petition for distribution of the estate on summary 21    administration and of the date, time and place of the 22    hearing on the petition (the notice having been published 23    once a week for 3 successive weeks in a newspaper 24    published in the county where the petition has been filed, 25    the first publication having been made not less than 30 26    days prior to the hearing) and has filed proof of   HB3207- 4 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1    publication with the clerk of the court;2the court may determine the rights of claimants and other 3persons interested in the estate, direct payment of claims and 4distribution of the estate on summary administration and 5excuse the issuance of letters of office or revoke the letters 6which have been issued and discharge the representative.7    Any claimant may file his claim in the proceeding at or 8before the hearing on the petition, but failure to do so does 9not deprive the claimant of his right to enforce his claim in 10any other manner provided by law.11    A petition for distribution on summary administration may 12be combined with or filed separately from a petition for 13probate of a will or for administration of an estate.14(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 15    (755 ILCS 5/25-1)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 25-1)16    Sec. 25-1. Payment or delivery of small estate of decedent 17upon affidavit.18    (a) When any person, corporation, or financial institution 19(1) indebted to or holding personal estate of a decedent, (2) 20controlling the right of access to decedent's safe deposit box 21or (3) acting as registrar or transfer agent of any evidence of 22interest, indebtedness, property or right is furnished with a 23small estate affidavit in substantially the form hereinafter 24set forth, that person, corporation, or financial institution 25shall pay the indebtedness, grant access to the safe deposit   HB3207- 5 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1box, deliver the personal estate or transfer or issue the 2evidence of interest, indebtedness, property or right to 3persons and in the manner specified in the affidavit or to an 4agent appointed as hereinafter set forth.5    (b)        Small Estate Affidavit6    I,        (name of affiant)    , on oath state:7    1.  (a) My post office address is:                      ;8        (b) My residence address is:                    ; and9        (c) I understand that, if I am an out-of-state 10resident, I submit myself to the jurisdiction of Illinois 11courts for all matters related to the preparation and use of 12this affidavit. My agent for service of process in Illinois 13is:14NAME..........................15ADDRESS.......................16CITY..........................17TELEPHONE (IF ANY)............18I understand that if no person is named above as my agent for 19service or, if for any reason, service on the named person 20cannot be effectuated, the clerk of the circuit court of 21......(County) (Judicial Circuit) Illinois is recognized by 22Illinois law as my agent for service of process.23    2. The decedent's name is            ;24    3. The date of the decedent's death was            , and I 25have attached a copy of the death certificate hereto.26    4. The decedent's place of residence immediately before   HB3207- 6 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1his death was            ;2    5. No letters of office are now outstanding on the 3decedent's estate and no petition for letters is contemplated 4or pending in Illinois or in any other jurisdiction, to my 5knowledge;6    6. The gross value of the decedent's entire personal 7estate, including the value of all property passing to any 8party either by intestacy or under a will, does not exceed 9$500,000 $100,000. (Here, list each asset, e.g., cash, stock, 10and its fair market value.);11    7. (a) All of the decedent's funeral expenses and other 12debts have been paid, or13    (b) All of the decedent's known unpaid debts are listed 14and classified as follows (include the name, post office 15address, and amount):16    Class 1: funeral and burial expenses, which include 17    reasonable amounts paid for a burial space, crypt, or 18    niche; a marker on the burial space; and care of the burial 19    space, crypt, or niche; expenses of administration; and 20    statutory custodial claims as follows:21    .........................................................22    Class 2: the surviving spouse's award or child's award, if 23    applicable, as follows:24    .........................................................25    Class 3: debts due the United States, as follows:26    .........................................................  HB3207- 7 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1    Class 4: money due employees of the decedent of not more 2    than $800 for each claimant for services rendered within 4 3    months prior to the decedent's death and expenses 4    attending the last illness, as follows:5    .........................................................6    Class 5: money and property received or held in trust by 7    the decedent which cannot be identified or traced, as 8    follows:9    .........................................................10    Class 6: debts due the State of Illinois and any county, 11    township, city, town, village, or school district located 12    within Illinois, as follows:13    .........................................................14    Class 7: all other claims, as follows:15    ................................16(Strike either 7(a) or 7(b)).17    7.5. I understand that all valid claims against the 18decedent's estate described in paragraph 7 must be paid by me 19from the decedent's estate before any distribution is made to 20any heir or legatee. I further understand that the decedent's 21estate should pay all claims in the order set forth above, and 22if the decedent's estate is insufficient to pay the claims in 23any one class, the claims in that class shall be paid pro rata.24    8. There is no known unpaid claimant or contested claim 25against the decedent, except as stated in paragraph 7.26    9. (a) The names and places of residence of any surviving   HB3207- 8 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1spouse, minor children and adult dependent* children of the 2decedent are as follows:3Name andPlace ofAge of4RelationshipResidenceminor child 5*(Note: An adult dependent child is one who is unable to 6maintain himself and is likely to become a public charge.)7    (b) The award allowable to the surviving spouse of a 8decedent who was an Illinois resident is $.......... ($20,000, 9plus $10,000 multiplied by the number of minor children and 10adult dependent children who resided with the surviving spouse 11at the time of the decedent's death. If any such child did not 12reside with the surviving spouse at the time of the decedent's 13death, so indicate).14    (c) If there is no surviving spouse, the award allowable 15to the minor children and adult dependent children of a 16decedent who was an Illinois resident is $.......... ($20,000, 17plus $10,000 multiplied by the number of minor children and 18adult dependent children), to be divided among them in equal 19shares.20    10. (a) The decedent left no will. The names, places of 21residence and relationships of the decedent's heirs, and the 22portion of the estate to which each heir is entitled under the 23law where decedent died intestate are as follows:24Name, relationshipAge ofPortion of25and place of residenceminorEstate  HB3207- 9 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1OR2    (b) The decedent left a will, which has been filed with the 3clerk of an appropriate court. A certified copy of the will on 4file is attached. To the best of my knowledge and belief the 5will on file is the decedent's last will and was signed by the 6decedent and the attesting witnesses as required by law and 7would be admittable to probate. The names and places of 8residence of the legatees and the portion of the estate, if 9any, to which each legatee is entitled are as follows:10Name, relationshipAge ofPortion of11and place of residenceminorEstate 12    (Strike either 10(a) or 10(b)).13    (c) Affiant is unaware of any dispute or potential 14conflict as to the heirship or will of the decedent.15    10.3. My relationship to the decedent or the decedent's 16estate is as follows:....................................17    10.5. (The following paragraph should appear in bold type 18and in not less than 14-point font):19        I understand that the decedent's estate must be 20    distributed first to satisfy claims against the decedent's 21    estate as set forth in paragraph 7.5 of this affidavit 22    before any distribution is made to any heir or legatee. By 23    signing this affidavit, I agree to indemnify and hold 24    harmless all creditors of the decedent's estate, the 25    decedent's heirs and legatees, and other persons,   HB3207- 10 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1    corporations, or financial institutions relying upon this 2    affidavit who incur any loss because of reliance on this 3    affidavit, up to the amount lost because of any act or 4    omission by me. I further understand that any person, 5    corporation, or financial institution recovering under 6    this indemnification provision shall be entitled to 7    reasonable attorney's fees and the expenses of recovery.8    11. After payment by me from the decedent's estate of all 9debts and expenses listed in paragraph 7, any remaining 10property described in paragraph 6 of this affidavit should be 11distributed as follows: 12    Name        Specific sum or property to be distributed  13The foregoing statement is made under the penalties of 14perjury*.15.........................16Signature of Affiant     17Signed and sworn before me on (insert date). 18.........................19Notary Public 20*(Note: A fraudulent statement made under the penalties of 21perjury is perjury, as defined in Section 32-2 of the Criminal 22Code of 2012.)  HB3207- 11 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1    (c) Appointment of Agent. If safe deposit access is 2involved or if sale of any personal property is desirable to 3facilitate distribution pursuant to the small estate 4affidavit, the affiant under the small estate affidavit may in 5writing appoint one or more persons as the affiant's agent for 6that purpose. The agent shall have power, without court 7approval, to gain access to, sell, and distribute the property 8in the manner specified in paragraphs 7.5 and 11 of the 9affidavit; and the payment, delivery, transfer, access or 10issuance shall be made or granted to or on the order of the 11agent. The affiant may appoint himself or herself as the 12designated representative to exercise the powers and perform 13the duties of an agent described in this subsection (c). 14    (d) Reliance and Release. Any person, corporation, or 15financial institution who acts in good faith reliance on a 16copy of a document purporting to be a small estate affidavit 17that is substantially in compliance with subsection (b) of 18this Section shall be fully protected and released upon 19payment, delivery, transfer, access or issuance pursuant to 20such a document to the same extent as if the payment, delivery, 21transfer, access or issuance had been made or granted to the 22representative of the estate. Such person, corporation, or 23financial institution is not required to see to the 24application or disposition of the property; but each person to 25whom a payment, delivery, transfer, access or issuance is made 26or given is answerable therefor to any person having a prior   HB3207- 12 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1right and is accountable to any representative of the estate.2    (e) Distributions pursuant to an affidavit substantially 3in the form set forth in subsection (b) of this Section may be 4made to the affiant, if so specified in paragraph 11, 5notwithstanding the disclosure of known unpaid debts. The 6affiant, acting on behalf of the decedent's estate, is 7obligated to pay all valid claims against the decedent's 8estate before any distribution is made to any heir or legatee. 9The affiant signing the small estate affidavit prepared 10pursuant to subsection (b) of this Section shall indemnify and 11hold harmless all creditors, heirs, and legatees of the 12decedent and other persons, corporations, or financial 13institutions relying upon the affidavit who incur loss because 14of such reliance. That indemnification shall only be up to the 15amount lost because of the act or omission of the affiant. Any 16person, corporation, or financial institution recovering under 17this subsection (e) shall be entitled to reasonable attorney's 18fees and the expenses of recovery.19    (f) The affiant of a small estate affidavit who is a 20non-resident of Illinois submits himself or herself to the 21jurisdiction of Illinois courts for all matters related to the 22preparation or use of the affidavit. The affidavit shall 23provide the name, address, and phone number of a person whom 24the affiant names as his agent for service of process. If no 25such person is named or if, for any reason, service on the 26named person cannot be effectuated, the clerk of the circuit   HB3207- 13 -LRB104 08631 JRC 18683 b1court of the county or judicial circuit of which the decedent 2was a resident at the time of his death shall be the agent for 3service of process.4    (g) Any action properly taken under this Section, as 5amended by Public Act 93-877, on or after August 6, 2004 (the 6effective date of Public Act 93-877) is valid regardless of 7the date of death of the decedent. 8    (h) The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 96th 9General Assembly apply to a decedent whose date of death is on 10or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th 11General Assembly. 12    (i) The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 98th 13General Assembly apply to a decedent whose date of death is on 14or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 98th 15General Assembly.16(Source: P.A. 97-1150, eff. 1-25-13; 98-836, eff. 1-1-15.)